Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-275
County supervisors; certificates of election; where filed.

The supervisors shall severally lay before the board, at the first regular meeting after election, their certificates of election, which shall be examined by the board, and if found regular, shall be filed in the office of the county clerk.

Laws 1879, § 66, p. 372;

R.S.1913, § 1067;

C.S.1922, § 969;

C.S.1929, § 26-283;

R.S.1943, § 23-275.

County commissioner-elect would not be presumed to have qualified before regular meeting in January. Kerr v. Adams County, 96 Neb. 178, 147 N.W. 683 (1914).